Illinois, session 104th, HB3256.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the People 5Over Parking Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Car share vehicles" means motor vehicles that are 8operated as part of a regional fleet by a public or private car 9sharing company or organization and provides hourly or daily 10service. 11    "Commercial development project" means a development 12project that is undertaken for the development of land for 13commercial use, including residential housing, multi-family 14housing, mixed use housing, and non-residential commercial 15developments. 16    "Development project" means a project undertaken for the 17purpose of development of land. "Development project" includes 18(i) a project involving the issuance of a permit for 19construction or reconstruction, (ii) a housing development 20project, or (iii) a commercial development project. 21"Development project" does not include a project where any 22portion is designated for use as a hotel, motel, bed and 23breakfast inn, or other transient lodging, except where a   HB3256- 2 -LRB104 11402 RTM 21490 b1portion of a housing development project is designated for use 2as a residential hotel. 3    "Efficiency living unit" has the meaning ascribed to that 4term in the 2018 International Building Code, Sixth Version 5(November 2021). 6    "Elderly housing", "low-income household", 7"moderate-income household", "multifamily housing", and "very 8low-income household" have the meanings ascribed to those 9terms in the Illinois Affordable Housing Act. 10    "Housing development project" means a development project 11consisting of (i) residential units only, (ii) mixed-use 12developments consisting of residential and nonresidential uses 13with at least two-thirds of the square footage designated for 14residential use, or (iii) transitional housing or supportive 15housing. 16    "Maximum automobile parking requirements" means any law, 17code, or policy which limits a maximum number of off-street, 18private parking spaces for new residential and commercial 19developments. 20    "Minimum automobile parking requirements" means any law, 21code, or policy which requires a minimum number of off-street, 22private parking spaces for new residential and commercial 23developments. 24    "On-street parking" means parking of vehicles on public 25streets or thoroughfares located within the physical 26boundaries of a municipality.   HB3256- 3 -LRB104 11402 RTM 21490 b1    "Public transportation hub" means a rail transit station, 2a boat or ferry terminal served by either a bus connection stop 3or rail transit station, or a bus connection stop of 2 or more 4major bus routes with a frequency of bus service interval of 15 5minutes or less during the morning and afternoon peak commute 6periods. 7    "Residential hotel" means any building containing 6 or 8more guest rooms or efficiency living units that is used or 9intended or designed to be used, rented, hired out, or 10occupied for sleeping purposes by guests and that is also the 11primary residence of those guests. "Residential hotel" does 12not include any building containing 6 or more guest rooms or 13efficiency living units primarily used by transient guests who 14do not occupy the building as their primary residence. 15    Section 10. Minimum automobile parking requirements 16prohibited. Except as otherwise provided in Section 15, a unit 17of local government may not impose or enforce any minimum 18automobile parking requirements on a development project if 19the project is located within one-half mile of a public 20transportation hub. 21    Section 15. Exceptions and limitations to prohibited 22minimum automobile parking requirements. 23    (a) If a development project provides automobile parking 24voluntarily, then a unit of local government may impose on the   HB3256- 4 -LRB104 11402 RTM 21490 b1development project requirements for parking spaces to be made 2available for car share vehicles, for parking spaces to be 3shared with the public, or for parking spaces to be made 4available only for a fee. A unit of local government may not 5require voluntarily provided parking to be provided free of 6charge. 7    (b) Section 10 does not apply to minimum automobile 8parking requirements if it conflicts with a contractual 9agreement or approved site plan with the unit of local 10government that was executed or approved on or before the 11effective date of this Act. However, Section 10 applies to an 12amendment or extension to the contractual agreement or 13approved site plan if the amendment or extension increases 14automobile parking requirements. 15    (c) A development project may voluntarily build additional 16parking that is not shared with the public. 17    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to prevent a 18unit of local government from regulating access to on-street 19parking. 20    (e) Nothing in this Act prevents a unit of local 21government from enacting or enforcing local laws that 22establish a maximum parking requirement. 23    (f) Nothing in this Act prevents a unit of local 24government from enacting or enforcing local laws that 25establish a minimum parking requirement for bicycles, 26including electric-assisted bicycles.   HB3256- 5 -LRB104 11402 RTM 21490 b1    Section 90. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 2minimum automobile parking requirements in a manner 3inconsistent with this Act. This Act is a limitation under 4subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 5Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 6powers and functions exercised by the State. 7    Section 95. Conflict with other laws. To the extent that 8this Act conflicts with any other provision of law, this Act 9controls. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 1, 112025.